Indiana, session 2026, HB1308.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 12-17.2-7.8 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 7.8. Indiana Bright Start Program and Fund
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "accepted intermediary" refers
to a nonprofit corporation that has entered into an agreement with
the office to facilitate the Indiana bright start program under
section 11 of this chapter.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "CCDF" refers to the federal
Child Care and Development Fund program administered under
45 CFR 98 and 45 CFR 99.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "eligible child" refers to an
individual who is:
(1) less than five (5) years of age on August 1 of the state fiscal
year for which a grant is sought under the Indiana bright
start program;
(2) a resident of Indiana or otherwise has legal settlement in
2026 IN 1308—LS 6797/DI 152


Indiana, as determined under IC 20-26-11; and
(3) unable to participate in the prekindergarten program (as
described in IC 12-17.2-7.2-5) or CCDF because the
individual:
(A) is a member of a household with an annual income that
exceeds eligibility limits; or
(B) has been placed on a wait list.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "eligible provider" refers to a
provider that satisfies the following conditions:
(1) The provider is:
(A) a:
(i) child care center licensed under IC 12-17.2-4;
(ii) child care home licensed under IC 12-17.2-5; or
(iii) child care ministry registered under IC 12-17.2-6;
that meets the standards of quality recognized by a Level
3 or Level 4 paths to QUALITY program rating;
(B) a public school, including a charter school; or
(C) a nonpublic school that is accredited by the state board
of education or a national or regional accreditation agency
that is recognized by the state board of education.
(2) The provider:
(A) provides child care or educational services to an
eligible child; and
(B) complies with Indiana bright start program rules
established by the office.
Sec. 5. As used in this chapter, the "Indiana bright start fund"
refers to the Indiana bright start fund established by section 10 of
this chapter.
Sec. 6. As used in this chapter, the "Indiana bright start
program" refers to the Indiana bright start program established
by section 9 of this chapter.
Sec. 7. As used in this chapter, "office" means the office of the
secretary of family and social services.
Sec. 8. As used in this chapter, "paths to QUALITY program"
has the meaning set forth in IC 12-17.2-2-14.2(b).
Sec. 9. (a) The Indiana bright start program is established to
support the early learning and child care needs of working families
with eligible children.
(b) The office shall develop and implement the Indiana bright
start program. The Indiana bright start program developed by the
office shall prioritize grants as follows:
(1) To provide tuition assistance to an eligible child:
2026 IN 1308—LS 6797/DI 152


(A) less than three (3) years of age on August 1 of the state
fiscal year for which a grant is sought under the Indiana
bright start program; and
(B) who is a member of a family with a household income
that does not exceed eighty-five percent (85%) of Indiana's
state median income for the household's family size.
(2) To provide tuition assistance to an eligible child:
(A) between four (4) years of age and five (5) years of age
on August 1 of the state fiscal year for which a grant is
sought under the Indiana bright start program; and
(B) who is a member of a family with a household income
that does not exceed eighty-five percent (85%) of Indiana's
state median income for the household's family size.
(3) To provide tuition assistance to an eligible child who is a
member of a household with an income that exceeds
eighty-five percent (85%) of Indiana's state median income
for the household's family size.
(4) To provide grants to eligible providers located in
communities with demonstrated scarcity of child care and
prekindergarten programs, as determined by the office, to
increase capacity for eligible children and to support quality
improvement initiatives aligned with the paths to QUALITY
program.
Sec. 10. (a) The Indiana bright start fund is established to:
(1) provide tuition assistance to eligible children;
(2) provide expansion and quality improvement grants to
eligible providers; and
(3) pay accepted intermediaries for facilitating the Indiana
bright start program.
(b) The fund consists of:
(1) appropriations made by the general assembly;
(2) subject to available funding, money available to the office;
(3) gifts, grants, donations, or other contributions from public
or private sources;
(4) any federal grants that are received to capitalize or
supplement the fund; and
(5) interest deposited in the fund under subsection (e).
(c) The office shall administer the fund.
(d) The expenses of administering the fund shall be paid from
money in the fund.
(e) The treasurer of state shall invest the money in the fund not
currently needed to meet the obligations of the fund in the same
2026 IN 1308—LS 6797/DI 152


manner as other public funds may be invested. Interest that
accrues from these investments shall be deposited in the fund.
(f) Money in the fund at the end of a state fiscal year does not
revert to the state general fund.
Sec. 11. (a) The office may enter into agreements with nonprofit
corporations to facilitate the Indiana bright start program as
accepted intermediaries.
(b) The office shall disburse funds to an accepted intermediary
in a manner determined by the office for the purposes of the
Indiana bright start program.
Sec. 12. Beginning October 1, 2027, and each October 1
thereafter, the office shall:
(1) collect and compile information concerning the Indiana
bright start program under this chapter; and
(2) submit the report described in subdivision (1) to the
following:
(A) The governor.
(B) The legislative council, in an electronic format under
IC 5-14-6.
Sec. 13. The office may adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to
implement this chapter.
2026 IN 1308—LS 6797/DI 152